Yamls/Pron-kytshom_gt-norm.yaml
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [кытшӧммес, кытшӧммезыс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесӧ, кытшӧммезсӧ]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслӧн, кытшӧммезыслӧн]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслісь, кытшӧммезыслісь]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслӧ, кытшӧммезыслӧ]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: кытшӧммезнас 
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧт, кытшӧммезыскӧт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [кытшӧмместӧг, кытшӧммезыстӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесла, кытшӧммезысла]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесся, кытшӧммезысся]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: кытшӧммезас
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесис, кытшӧммезсис]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: кытшӧммезас
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслань, кытшӧммезыслань, кытшӧммезланяс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммессянь, кытшӧммезыссянь, кытшӧммезсяняс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезӧттяс, кытшӧммезӧттис]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезӧдззас, кытшӧммезӧдззис]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесви, кытшӧммезысви]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезланяс, кытшӧммесланьын, кытшӧммезысланьын]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезланьсис, кытшӧммесланись, кытшӧммезысланись]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезланяс, кытшӧммесланьӧ, кытшӧммезысланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьсянь, кытшӧммезысланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьӧт, кытшӧммезысланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяс, кытшӧммезланьӧттис]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьӧдз, кытшӧммезысланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззас, кытшӧммезланьӧдззис]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьви, кытшӧммезысланьви]

 
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: кытшӧммезным
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымӧс
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлӧн
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлісь
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлӧ
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнаным 
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымкӧт
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымтӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымла
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымся
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: кытшӧммезаным
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [кытшӧммесиным, кытшӧммезсиным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: кытшӧммезаным
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымлань, кытшӧммезланяным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымсянь, кытшӧммезсяняным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезӧттяным, кытшӧммезӧттиным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезӧдззаным, кытшӧммезӧдззиным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымви
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезланяным, кытшӧммезнымланьын]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезланьсиным, кытшӧммезнымланись]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезланяным, кытшӧммезнымланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяным, кытшӧммезланьӧттиным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаным, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиным]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымланьви 


    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: кытшӧммезныт
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытӧ
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытлӧн
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытлісь
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытлӧ
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнаныт 
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com+PxPl2: кытшӧммезныткӧт
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезныттӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытла
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытся
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: кытшӧммезаныт
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [кытшӧммесиныт, кытшӧммезсиныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: кытшӧммезаныт
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытлань, кытшӧммезланяныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытсянь, кытшӧммезсяняныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезӧттяныт, кытшӧммезӧттиныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезӧдззаныт, кытшӧммезӧдззиныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытви
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезланяныт, кытшӧммезнытланьын]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезланьсиныт, кытшӧммезнытланись]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезланяныт, кытшӧммезнытланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяныт, кытшӧммезланьӧттиныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаныт, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиныт]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытланьви 


    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныс
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысӧ
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныслӧн
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныслісь
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныслӧ
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнаныс 
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныскӧт
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезныстӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысла
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысся
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: кытшӧммезаныс
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [кытшӧммесиныс, кытшӧммезсиныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: кытшӧммезаныс
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезныслань, кытшӧммезланяныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезныссянь, кытшӧммезсяняныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезӧттяныс, кытшӧммезӧттиныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезӧдззаныс, кытшӧммезӧдззиныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысви
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезланяныс, кытшӧммезнысланьын]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезланьсиныс, кытшӧммезнысланись]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезланяныс, кытшӧммезнысланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезнысланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезнысланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяныс, кытшӧммезланьӧттиныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезнысланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаныс, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиныс]
    кытшӧм+Pron+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысланьви 


##Pronoun – кытшӧмкӧ: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Jonkinlainen / Какой-то'
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: кытшӧмкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: кытшӧмӧськӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [кытшӧмӧкӧ, кытшӧмӧскӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: кытшӧмлӧнкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: кытшӧмліськӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: кытшӧмлӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: кытшӧмӧнкӧ 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: кытшӧмкӧкӧт
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: кытшӧмкӧтӧг
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: кытшӧмлакӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: [кытшӧмкӧся, кытшӧмсякӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: кытшӧмынкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: кытшӧмиськӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: кытшӧмӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: [кытшӧмкӧлань, кытшӧмланькӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: [кытшӧмкӧсянь, кытшӧмсянькӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: кытшӧмӧткӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: кытшӧмӧдзкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: [кытшӧмкӧви, кытшӧмвикӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: [кытшӧмкӧланьын, кытшӧмланьынкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: [кытшӧмкӧланись, кытшӧмланиськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: [кытшӧмкӧланьӧ, кытшӧмланьӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: [кытшӧмкӧланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсянькӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: [кытшӧмкӧланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: [кытшӧмкӧланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдзкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: [кытшӧмкӧланьви, кытшӧмланьвикӧ]


    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧскӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧлӧнкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧліськӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧлӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: кытшӧмнамкӧ 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧкӧт, кытшӧмӧкӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧтӧг, кытшӧмкӧтӧгьям, кытшӧмтӧгьямкӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧла, кытшӧмӧлакӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧся, кытшӧмӧсякӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: кытшӧмамкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: кытшӧмсимкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: кытшӧмамкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧлань, кытшӧмӧланькӧ, кытшӧмкӧланям, кытшӧмланямкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧсянь, кытшӧмӧсянькӧ, кытшӧмкӧсяням, кытшӧмсянямкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧттямкӧ, кытшӧмӧттимкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧдззамкӧ, кытшӧмӧдззимкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧви, кытшӧмӧвикӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [кытшӧмкӧланям, кытшӧмланямкӧ, кытшӧмӧкӧланьын, кытшӧмӧланьынкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [кытшӧмкӧланьсим, кытшӧмланьсимкӧ, кытшӧмӧкӧланись, кытшӧмӧланиськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [кытшӧмкӧланям, кытшӧмланямкӧ, кытшӧмӧкӧланьӧ, кытшӧмӧланьӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмкӧланьсяням, кытшӧмланьсянямкӧ, кытшӧмӧкӧланьсянь, кытшӧмӧланьсянькӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кытшӧмкӧланьӧттям, кытшӧмкӧланьӧттим, кытшӧмланьӧттямкӧ, кытшӧмланьӧттимкӧ, кытшӧмӧкӧланьӧт, кытшӧмӧланьӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кытшӧмкӧланьӧдззам, кытшӧмкӧланьӧдззим, кытшӧмланьӧдззамкӧ, кытшӧмланьӧдззимкӧ, кытшӧмӧкӧланьӧдз, кытшӧмӧланьӧдзкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧкӧланьви, кытшӧмӧланьвикӧ]
